Illinois, session 104th, HB1272.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Wholesale Prescription Drug Importation Program Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Canadian supplier" means a manufacturer, wholesale 8distributor, or pharmacy that is appropriately licensed or 9permitted under Canadian federal or provincial laws and rules 10to manufacture, distribute, or dispense prescription drugs. 11    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 12    "Director" means the Director of Public Health.13    "Prescription drug wholesaler" means a person or entity 14licensed as a wholesale drug distributor under the Wholesale 15Drug Distribution Licensing Act, that contracts with this 16State to import prescription drugs under the program. 17    "Program" means the Wholesale Prescription Drug 18Importation Program. 19    Section 10. Wholesale Prescription Drug Importation 20Program. 21    (a) The Department shall establish the Wholesale 22Prescription Drug Importation Program to provide lower cost   HB1272- 2 -LRB104 06227 BAB 16262 b1prescription drugs available outside of the United States to 2consumers in this State at the lower cost.3    (b) The Department shall implement the program by:4        (1) contracting with one or more prescription drug 5    wholesalers and Canadian suppliers to import prescription 6    drugs and provide prescription drug cost savings to 7    consumers in this State;8        (2) developing a registration process for health 9    benefit plan issuers, health care providers, and 10    pharmacies to obtain and dispense prescription drugs 11    imported under the program;12        (3) developing a list of prescription drugs, including 13    the prices of those drugs, that meet the requirements of 14    Section 15 and publishing the list on the Department's 15    website; 16        (4) establishing an outreach and marketing plan to 17    generate program awareness;18        (5) establishing and administering a telephone call 19    center or electronic portal to provide information about 20    the program;21        (6) ensuring the program and the prescription drug 22    wholesalers that contract with this State under paragraph 23    (1) comply with the tracking, tracing, verification, and 24    identification requirements of 21 U.S.C. 360eee-1;25        (7) prohibiting the distribution, dispensing, or sale 26    of prescription drugs imported under this Act outside the   HB1272- 3 -LRB104 06227 BAB 16262 b1    boundaries of this State; and 2        (8) performing any other duties the Director 3    determines necessary to implement the program. 4    (c) The Department shall ensure that the program meets the 5requirements of 21 U.S.C. 384.6    (d) In developing the program, the Department may consult 7with interested parties.  8    Section 15. Eligible prescription drugs. A prescription 9drug may be imported into this State under the program only if 10the drug:11        (1) meets the United States Food and Drug 12    Administration's standards related to prescription drug 13    safety, effectiveness, misbranding, and adulteration;14        (2) does not violate any federal patent laws through 15    its importation; 16        (3) is expected to generate cost savings for 17    consumers; and18        (4) is not:19            (A) listed as a controlled substance under State 20        or federal law;21            (B) a biological product;22            (C) an infused drug;23            (D) an intravenously injected drug;24            (E) a drug that is inhaled during surgery; or25            (F) a parenteral drug.    HB1272- 4 -LRB104 06227 BAB 16262 b1    Section 20. Program expansion. In its discretion, the 2Department may by rule expand the Program to import 3prescription drugs from any other country that is allowed 4under federal law to import prescription drugs into the United 5States. 6    Section 25. Anticompetitive behavior monitoring. The 7Department, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall 8identify and monitor any potential anticompetitive activities 9in industries affected by the program.  10    Section 30. Program funding. In addition to money 11appropriated by the General Assembly, the Department may 12impose a fee on each prescription drug sold under the program 13or establish another funding method to administer the program.  14    Section 35. Audit procedures. The Director, by rule, shall 15develop procedures to effectively audit a prescription drug 16wholesaler participating in the program.  17    Section 40. Annual reporting. Not later than December 1, 182026, and each December 1 thereafter, the Department shall 19submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly 20regarding the operation of the program during the preceding 21State fiscal year, including:   HB1272- 5 -LRB104 06227 BAB 16262 b1        (1) which prescription drugs and Canadian suppliers 2    are included in the program;3        (2) the number of health benefit plan issuers, health 4    care providers, and pharmacies participating in the 5    program; 6        (3) the number of prescriptions dispensed through the 7    program; 8        (4) the estimated cost savings to consumers, health 9    plans, employers, and this State since the establishment 10    of the program and during the preceding State fiscal year; 11        (5) information regarding the implementation of the 12    audit procedures under Section 35; and 13        (6) any other information: 14            (A) the Governor or the General Assembly requests; 15        or16            (B) the Department considers necessary.  17    Section 45. Rules. As soon as practicable after the 18effective date of this Act, the Director shall adopt any rules 19necessary to implement this Act.  20    Section 50. Federal waiver or authorization. If, before 21implementing any provision of this Act, a State agency 22determines that a waiver or authorization from a federal 23agency is necessary for implementation of that provision, the 24agency affected by the provision shall request the waiver or   HB1272- 6 -LRB104 06227 BAB 16262 b1authorization and may delay implementing that provision until 2the waiver or authorization is granted.  3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42025.